hu: Hangszedő típusa: Aktív; Felcsíptethető; Dogear; Humbucker; Mágneses; P-90; Piezo; Egytekercses; Soapbar; Soundhole; Undersaddle; Egyéb
ru: Тип звукоснимателя: Активный; Зажим; Dogear; Humbucker; Магнитный; P-90; Пьезо; Одинарная катушка; Мыльница; Резонатор; Undersaddle; Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta gitarskog magneta: Aktivno; Na kopčanje; Dogear; Humbucker; Magnetni; P-90; Piezo; Jedna zavojnica; Soapbar; Zvučna rupa; Podsedlo; Ostalo
en: Pickup type: Active; Clip-on; Dogear; Humbucker; Magnetic; P-90; Piezo; Single coil; Soapbar; Soundhole; Undersaddle; Other
it: Tipo di pickup: Attivo; Chiusura a scatto; Dogear; Humbucker; Magnetico; P-90; Piezo; Bobina singola; Saponetta; Soundhole; Sottosella; Altro
sk-SK: Typ snímača: Aktívny; Svorka; Dogear; Humbucker; Magnetický; P-90; Piezo; Jedna cievka; Soapbar; Soundhole; Undersaddle; Iné
es: Tipo de pastilla: Activo; Con clip; Dogear; Humbucker; Magnético; P-90; Piezo; Bobina simple; Barra de jabón; Boca; Cable para selleta; Otros
el: Τύπος μαγνήτη: Ενεργή; Κουμπωτό; Dogear; Humbucker; Μαγνητικό; P-90; Piezo; Μονού πηνίου; Soapbar; Soundhole; Undersaddle; Άλλο
de: Typ des Tonabnehmers: Aktiv; Zum Anklipsen; Dogear; Humbucker; Magnetisch; P-90; Piezo; Einzelspule; Seifenstück; Schallloch; Untersteg; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tipul dozei: Activă; Clemă; Dogear; Humbucker; Magnetic; P-90; Piezo; O singură bobină; Soapbar; Soundhole; Undersaddle; Altele
vi: Kiểu bộ phận giữ kim máy quay đĩa: Chủ động; Dạng kẹp; Dogear; Humbucker; Từ tính; P-90; Áp điện; Cuộn đơn; Soapbar; Lỗ âm; Thiết bị Undersaddle; Khác
tr: Pikap türü: Aktif; Klipsli; Kıvrık sayfa; Çiftli manyetik; Manyetik; P-90; Piezo; Tekli manyetik; Sabun kalıbı; Soundhole; Undersaddle; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de pickup: Ativo; Fecho de encaixe; Marcador; Humbucker; Magnético; P-90; Piezo; Single coil; Barra de sabão; Orifício de som; Parte inferior da bridge; Outro
th: ประเภทพิกอัป: แบบแอกทีฟ; แบบหนีบ; รางแบบหูพับ; ปิ๊กอัพฮัมบักเกอร์; แม่เหล็ก; P-90; เพียโซ; ปิ๊กอัพซิงเกิ้ลคอยล์; โซปบาร์; ซาวด์โฮล; อันเดอร์แซตเดิล; อื่นๆ
ko: 가제트팔 유형: 액티브; 클립식; 독이어; 험버커; 자기식; P-90; Piezo; 싱글 코일; 비누바; 사운드홀; 언더새들; 기타
pl: Typ przetwornika: Aktywna; Z zaciskiem; Zakładka; Humbucker; Magnetyczny; P-90; Piezo; Pojedyncza cewka; Mydło w kostce; Dziura dźwiękowa; Przetwornik pod siodełkiem; Inne
bg-BG: Тип пикап: Активно; Clip-on; Dogear; Humbucker; Магнитно; P-90; Пиезо; Единична бобина; Soapbar; Звуков отвор; Под седлото; Други
sv: Pickuptyp: Aktiv; Clip-on; Dogear-kåpa; Humbucker; Magnetisk; P-90; Piezo; Enkel spole; Tvål; Ljudhål; Under sadeln; Övrigt
ja: ピックアップの種類: アクティブ; クリップ式; ドッグイヤー; ハムバッカー; 磁気; P-90; ピエゾ; シングルコイル; ソープバー; サウンドホール; アンダーサドル; その他
nl: Type pickup: Actief; Clip-on; Dogear; Humbucker; Magnetisch; P-90; Piezo; Enkele spoel; Zeepbakje; Klankgat; Onderzadel; Andere
fi: Avolavatyyppi: Aktiivinen; Klipsillinen; Dogear; Humbucker; Magneettinen; P-90; Pietso; Yksi kela; Soapbar; Ääniaukko; Alasatula; Muu
zh-CN: 拾音器类别: 活动型; 夹式; 折角; Humbucker; 磁力; P-90 拾音器; 压电拾音器; 单线圈; 肥皂; 音孔; 琴桥下拾音器; 其他
cs: Typ snímače: Aktivní; Klip; Nábytkový magnet; Humbucker; Magnetická; P-90; Piezo; Jediná cívka; Mýdlenka; Ozvučný otvor; Podsedlovka; Jiné
zh-TW: 拾音器類型: 主動; 夾式; Dogear; 雙線圈; 磁性; P-90; 接觸式; 單線圈; Soapbar; 音孔; 下弦枕式; 其他
lt-LT: Garso ėmiklio tipas: Aktyvus; Prisegamas; „Dogear“; „Humbucker“; Magnetinis; P-90; „Piezo“; Viena ritė; „Soapbar“; „Soudhole“; „Undersaddle“; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de coleta: Ativo; Clip-on; Dogear; Humbucker; Magnética; P-90; Piezoeletricidade; Bobina única; Sabão em barra; Orifício de som; Captador; Outro
da: Pickup-type: Aktiv; Clip-on; Dogear; Humbucker; Magnetisk; P-90; Piezo; Enkelt spole; Sæbebar; Lydhul; Undersadel; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta magnetov: Aktiven; Priponka; Dogear; Humbucker; Magnetno; P-90; Piezo; Enojna tuljava; Soapbar; Soundhole; Podsedlo; Drugo
fr: Type de retrait: Actif; À pince; Dogear; Humbucker; Magnétique; P-90; Piezo; Bobine unique; Barre de savon; Soundhole; Sous-sillet; Autre
nb: Pickup-type: Aktiv; Clip-on; Dogear; Humbucker; Magnetisk; P-90; Piezo; Enkeltcelle; Såpestykke; Lydhull; Undersal; Annet